Idaho, session 2026, H0520.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5242, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5242. HEARING NOTICES AND PROCEDURE AT HEARING. (1) When an agency
gives a person notice of an opportunity for a contested case hearing for
which the person is entitled to notice by law, the notice shall:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Set forth the agency action being taken;
(c) Identify the agency statute or rule authorizing the action;
(d) Inform the person of the right, procedure, and time limit to file a
request for hearing; and
(e) Provide citation to any agency rules and procedures governing the
contested case hearing.
(1) (2) In a contested case other than an emergency proceeding Other
than emergency proceedings held pursuant to section 62-5247, Idaho Code, all
parties to a contested case hearing shall receive notice that shall include:
(a) A statement of the time, place, and nature of the hearing;
(b) A statement of the legal authority under which the hearing is to be
held; and
(c) A short and plain statement of the matters asserted or the issues
involved.
(2) (3) At the hearing, the presiding officer:
(a) Shall regulate the course of the proceedings to assure that there
is a full disclosure of all relevant facts and issues, including such
cross-examination as may be necessary.
(b) Shall afford all parties the opportunity to respond and present ev-
idence and argument on all issues involved, except as restricted by a
limited grant of intervention or by a prehearing order.
(c) May give nonparties an opportunity to present oral or written
statements. If the presiding officer proposes to consider a statement
by a nonparty, the presiding officer shall give all parties an opportu-
nity to challenge or rebut it and, on motion of any party, the presiding
officer shall require the statement to be given under oath or affirma-
tion.
(d) Shall cause the hearing to be recorded at the agency's expense. Any
party, at that party's expense, may have a transcript prepared or may


cause additional recordings to be made during the hearing if the making
of the additional recording does not cause distraction or disruption.
(e) May conduct all or part of the hearing by telephone, video confer-
ence, or other electronic means, if each participant in the hearing has
an opportunity to participate in the entire proceeding while it is tak-
ing place.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.